District of Columbia statutes.
34-2202.06d

Water quality testing.

(a)

Beginning in January 2014, the Authority shall conduct testing of the District’s drinking water for, at a minimum, regulated contaminants included in the Revisions to the Unregulated Contaminant Monitoring Regulation for Public Water Systems set forth in 40 C.F.R. § 141.40.

(b)

After receiving results of each test as required by the United States Environmental Protection Agency, the Authority, within 120 days or when it submits the related report to the Environmental Protection Agency, whichever comes first, shall:

(1)

Report to the Mayor the results of each test; and

(2)

Make the results available to the public via the Authority’s website.

History

Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-111, § 206d
as added Mar. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-240, § 2(b), 59 DCR 14790

Section References

This section is referenced in § 34-2202.06e.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-240 added this section.